North Carolina, session 2025, SB237.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Citizens Advocating for Racial Equity
and Equality (CAREE), a nonprofit organization, to support the organization's transitional
housing efforts in Pitt County.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S237-v-1*